th: ประเภทวัสดุของสายพานขับ: ฝ้าย; ยางยืด; เคฟลาร์/อะรามิด; หนัง; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลียูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; ซิลิโคน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 傳動帶材質類型: 棉質; 彈性; Kevlar/芳綸; 皮革; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 矽膠; 其他
nl: Type materiaal aandrijfriem: Katoen; Elastiek; Kevlar/aramide; Leer; Nylon; Polyester; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Siliconen; Overige
lt-LT: Pavaros diržo medžiagos tipas: Medvilnė; Elastinė medžiaga; Kevlar / aramidas; Oda; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Poliuretanas (PU); Guma; Silikonas; Kita
tr: Tahrik kayışı malzeme tipi: Pamuk; Elastik; Kevlar/aramid; Deri; Naylon; Polyester; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Silikon; Diğer
ja: ドライブバンド素材タイプ: コットン; 伸縮性素材 (エラスティック); Kevlar/アラミド; レザー; ナイロン; ポリエステル; ポリウレタン (PU); ゴム; シリコーン; その他
sv: Typ av material på drivbandet: Bomull; Elastisk; Kevlar/aramid; Läder; Nylon; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Silikon; Övrigt
zh-CN: 传动带材质类型: 棉; 弹性材料; 凯夫拉/芳纶; 皮革; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 硅胶; 其他
hu: Hajtószíj anyagának típusa: Pamut; Elasztikus; Kevlár/aramid; Bőr; Nejlon; Poliészter; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Szilikon; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tipul materialului benzii de transmisie: Bumbac; Elastic; Kevlar/aramidă; Piele; Nailon; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Silicon; Altele
da: Materialetype for drivbånd: Bomuld; Elastisk; Kevlar/aramid; Læder; Nylon; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Silikone; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta materiala pogonskega jermena: Bombaž; Elastika; Kevlar/aramid; Usnje; Najlon; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Drugo
pl: Typ materiału cięgna napędowego: Bawełna; Elastyczne; Kevlar/aramid; Skóra; Nylon; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Inne
es: Tipo de material de la correa de transmisión: Algodón; Elástico; Kevlar/aramida; Cuero; Nailon; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Caucho; Silicona; Otro
en: Drive band material type: Cotton; Elastic; Kevlar/aramid; Leather; Nylon; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Silicone; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta pogonskog remena: Pamuk; Elastika; Kevlar/aramid; Koža; Najlon; Poliester; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Silikon; Ostalo
el: Τύπος υλικού ιμάντα κίνησης: Βαμβάκι; Ελαστικό; Kevlar/αραμίδιο; Δέρμα; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de material da correia de transmissão: Algodão; Elástico; Kevlar/aramida; Pele; Nylon; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Silicone; Outro
de: Art des Antriebsbandmaterials: Baumwolle; Elastisch; Kevlar/Aramid; Leder; Nylon; Polyester; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Silikon; Sonstige
it: Tipo di materiale della cinghia di trasmissione: Cotone; Elastica; Kevlar/aramide; Pelle; Nylon; Poliestere; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Silicone; Altro
cs: Typ materiálu hnacího řemene: Bavlna; Elastický materiál; Kevlar/aramid; Kůže; Nylon; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Pryž; Silikon; Jiné
vi: Loại chất liệu dây đai truyền động: Cotton; Đàn hồi; Kevlar/aramid; Da; Nylon; Polyester; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Silicone; Khác
fi: Vetohihnan materiaalin tyyppi: Puuvilla; Joustava; Kevlar/aramidi; Nahka; Nailon; Polyesteri; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Silikoni; Muu
fr: Type de matériau de la courroie d'entraînement: Coton; Élastique; Kevlar/aramide; Cuir; Nylon; Polyester; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Silicone; Autre
ko: 드라이브 밴드 소재 유형: 면; 엘라스틱; Kevlar/아라미드; 가죽; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 실리콘; 기타
ru: Тип материала приводного ремня: Хлопок; Эластичный материал; Kevlar/арамид; Кожа; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Полиуретан (ПУ); Резина; Силикон; Другое
sk-SK: Typ materiálu hnacieho remeňa: Bavlna; Elastická látka; Kevlar/aramid; Koža; Nylon; Polyester; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Silikón; Iné
nb: Type materiale i drivrem: Bomull; Elastisk; Kevlar/aramid; Lær; Nylon; Polyester; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Silikon; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de material da correia de transmissão: Algodão; Elástico; Kevlar/aramida; Couro; Nylon; Poliéster; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Silicone; Outros
bg-BG: Тип материал на задвижващия ремък: Памук; Еластично; Kevlar/арамид; Кожа; Найлон; Полиестер; Полиуретан (PU); Гума; Силикон; Друго